Wisconsin, session 2025, SB150.
do enact as follows:SB150,12Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.SB150,2,23(1) Reduction of carbon emissions. In the 2025-26 legislative session, the 4legislature shall pass legislation creating a viable plan to reduce carbon emissions 5in this state by 52 percent by 2030 and creating a viable plan for achieving carbon 1neutral emissions in this state by 2050. Any plan enacted under this subsection 2shall maximize the impact of the plan on improving economic and racial equity.SB150,2,33